South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3619.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 23, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-23-165. (A) The Law Enforcement Training Council shall develop a minimum set of uniform standards that a state or local law enforcement agency must follow when establishing and implementing a mediation program as an alternate method of resolving law enforcement misconduct complaints. (B) The standards shall include, but are not limited to: (1) the types of alleged law enforcement misconduct that may be referred to a mediation program; (2) individuals that may serve as mediators; (3) training required for mediators; (4) the rights and duties of a person whose complaint is referred to mediation; (5) the rights and duties of a law enforcement employee who is the subject of a complaint that is referred to mediation; (6) the impact of a decision rendered by a mediator; (7) steps to be taken if a decision is not rendered by a mediator; and (8) any other standards the council determines are necessary. (C) The council shall develop and offer programs to train mediators. (D) Mediators shall have no power to influence the outcome of the mediation. (E) A law enforcement agency that fails to comply with this section is subject to the provisions contained in Section 23-23-100. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----